Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.550

Community juvenile accountability programs—Short title.

RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540 may be known as the community juvenile accountability act.

[ 1997 c 338 s 66.]

NOTES:

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.